District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.04

Election of directors and composition of board.

(a)

Unless the organic rules require a greater number:

(1)

The number of directors that shall be patron members may not be fewer than:

(A)

One, if there are 2 or 3 directors;

(B)

Two, if there are 4 or 5 directors;

(C)

Three if there are 6 through 8 directors; or

(D)

One-third of the directors if there are at least 9 directors; and

(2)

A majority of the board of directors shall be elected exclusively by patron members.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, the directors who are not elected exclusively by patron members shall be elected by the investor members.

(c)

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the election of all or a specified number of directors by one or more districts or classes of members.

(d)

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the nomination or election of directors by districts or classes, directly or by district delegates.

(e)

If a class of members consists of a single member, the organic rules may provide for the member to appoint a director or directors.

(f)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, cumulative voting for directors shall be prohibited.

(g)

Except as otherwise provided in the organic rules, subsection (e) of this section, or §§ 29-1003.03, 29-1005.16, 29-1005.17, and 29-1008.09, member directors shall be elected at an annual members meeting.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 804 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition